Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3416
License required.

Except as provided in the Genetic Counseling
Practice Act, on and after January 1, 2013, no individual shall engage in
the practice of genetic counseling unless he or she is licensed under the
act.

Laws 2012, LB831, § 16.